Massachusetts, session 194th, H4839.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23A is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 69. Grants allocated to regional tourism councils through the Massachusetts
Tourism Trust Fund established in section 13T in chapter 23A shall be distributed as follows; at
least 50% of the total grant funds available shall be distributed not later than September 1st of
the fiscal year in which they are allocated, and the remainder of the grants shall be allocated not
later than December 1st of the fiscal year in which they are allocated.
of 1